Arkansas, session 2025, SB346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - STAFF SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Senate for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) DIRECTOR OF SENATE/SEC OF SENATE 1 GRADE EXE01
(2) SECRETARY OF SENATE 1 GRADE EXE01
(3) CHIEF COUNSEL/PARLIAMENTARIAN 1 GRADE SPC09
(4) CONSTITUENT SVCS 8 GRADE SPC07
(5) COMMUNICATIONS/PUBLIC INFORMATION 2 GRADE SPC06
(6) FISCAL OFFICER/EMPLOYEE BENEFITS LIAISON 1 GRADE SPC04
*JAR008*
04-09-2025 09:16:52 JAR008

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB346
(7) TECHNICAL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE SPC04
(8) LEGISLATIVE ASST/RECEPTIONIST/SESSION 3 GRADE SGS08
(9) PROPERTIES OFFICER/INVENTORY 1 GRADE SGS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 19

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - STAFF SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Arkansas Senate for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STAFF SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
Senate - Staff Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,963,896
(02) EXTRA HELP 50,000
(03) PERSONAL SERV MATCHING 587,183
(04) MAINT. & GEN OPERATION 250,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,851,079

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ORIENTATION. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable from the Constitutional Officers Fund,
for expenses of the State Orientation including the payment of per diem and
mileage of members of the Arkansas Senate who attend the Senate Orientation
program held prior to the convening of a Legislative Session of the General
Assembly, the sum of.................................................$15,000.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - REAPPROPRIATION - CONSTITUTIONAL OFFICERS
FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable
04-09-2025 09:16:52 JAR008

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB346
from the Constitutional Officers Fund, for the balance remaining on June 30,
2025 in the appropriations Section 3 of Act 1 of 2024, Sections 4 and 5 of
Act 32 of 2024, and SB1 as introduced in the 2025 Regular Session, there to
be used for any purpose to defray the necessary expenses of the Arkansas
Senate of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly, in a sum in the aggregate not to
exceed............................................................$4,000,000.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - REAPPROPRIATION - STATE CENTRAL SERVICES
FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable
from the State Central Services Fund, and payable from the balance remaining
on June 30, 2025 in the appropriations, Sections 3, 6, 7 and 8 of Act 32 of
2024 there to be used for any purpose to defray the necessary expenses of the
Arkansas Senate of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly, in a sum in the
aggregate not to exceed...........................................$4,000,000.

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - COMPUTERIZATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for expenses necessary in continuing the computerization of
the legislative process in the Arkansas Senate, the sum of..........$700,000.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Senate, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for construction, improvements, renovations and
equipping of the Arkansas Senate facilities and other purposes of the
Arkansas Senate, the sum of............................. .........$1,500,000.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFERS. If the Senate Efficiency Committee and the Secretary of the
Senate, subject to the approval of the Arkansas Senate, should determine that
any item or portion thereof appropriated herein for a specific purpose is not
needed for such purpose, the Secretary of the Senate may certify such fact to
the State Auditor and the State Auditor shall cause a transfer to be made
from one item to another.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
04-09-2025 09:16:52 JAR008

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB346
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SALARIES.
In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and
retained, the Senate may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than
twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions
authorized in their operation appropriation act, and may exceed the maximum
salary levels for the purpose of merit adjustments for all positions.

SECTION 11. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 12. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 13. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
04-09-2025 09:16:52 JAR008

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 SB346
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Senate Efficiency

































04-09-2025 09:16:52 JAR008